test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-mueqrjj_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - mueʹrjj e-stem: # Noun 'berry/marja' - full paradigm
     mueʹrjj+N+Sg+Nom: mueʹrjj
     mueʹrjj+N+Sg+Gen: mueʹrj
     mueʹrjj+N+Sg+Acc: mueʹrj
     mueʹrjj+N+Sg+Ill: [muârjja, muerjja]
     mueʹrjj+N+Sg+Loc: mueʹrjest
     mueʹrjj+N+Sg+Com: [muõʹrjin, mueʹrjin]
     mueʹrjj+N+Ess: mueʹrjjen
     mueʹrjj+N+Par: mueʹrjjed
     mueʹrjj+N+Sg+Abe: [mueʹrjtaa, mueʹrjtää]
     mueʹrjj+N+Pl+Nom: mueʹrj
     mueʹrjj+N+Pl+Gen: [muõʹrji, mueʹrji]
     mueʹrjj+N+Pl+Acc: [muõʹrjid, mueʹrjid]
     mueʹrjj+N+Pl+Ill: [muõʹrjid, mueʹrjid]
     mueʹrjj+N+Pl+Loc: [muõʹrjin, mueʹrjin]
     mueʹrjj+N+Pl+Com: [muõʹrjivuiʹm, mueʹrjivuiʹm]
     mueʹrjj+N+Pl+Abe: [muõʹrjitaa, muõʹrjitää, mueʹrjitaa, mueʹrjitää]
     mueʹrjj+N+Der/teʹm+A+Sg+Nom: mueʹrjteʹm
     mueʹrjj+N+Der/teʹm+A+Pl+Nom: mueʹrjteeʹm
     mueʹrjj+N+Der/teʹm+A+Attr: mueʹrjteʹmes
     mueʹrjj+N+Der/t+A+Comp: mueʹrjtab
     mueʹrjj+N+Der/t+A+Der/umus+Superl: mueʹrjtumus
     mueʹrjj+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: [muârjaž, muerjaž]
